Washington statutes.
RCW 18.160.030

State director of fire protection—Duties.

(1) This chapter shall be administered by the state director of fire protection.

(2) The state director of fire protection shall have the authority, and it shall be his or her duty to:

(a) Issue such administrative regulations as necessary for the administration of this chapter;

(b)(i) Set reasonable fees for licenses, certificates, testing, and other aspects of the administration of this chapter. However, the license fee for fire protection sprinkler system contractors engaged solely in the installation, inspection, maintenance, or servicing of NFPA 13-D fire protection sprinkler systems shall not exceed $125, and the license fee for fire protection sprinkler system contractors engaged solely in the installation, inspection, maintenance, or servicing of NFPA 13-R fire protection sprinkler systems shall not exceed $375;

(ii) Adopt rules establishing a special category restricted to contractors registered under chapter 18.27 RCW who install underground systems that service fire protection sprinkler systems. The rules shall be adopted within 90 days of March 31, 1992;

(iii) Subject to RCW 18.160.120, adopt rules defining infractions under this chapter and fines to be assessed for those infractions;

(c) Enforce the provisions of this chapter;

(d) Conduct investigations of complaints to determine if any infractions of this chapter or the regulations developed under this chapter have occurred;

(e) Assign a certificate number to each certificate of competency holder; and

(f) Adopt rules necessary to implement and administer a program which requires the affixation of a seal any time a fire protection sprinkler system is installed, which seal shall include the certificate number of any certificate of competency holder who installs, in whole or in part, the fire protection sprinkler system.

[ 2023 c 329 s 1; 2003 c 74 s 1; 2000 c 171 s 35; 1992 c 116 s 2; 1990 c 177 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 329: "This act takes effect January 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 329 s 7.]